Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2353.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1206.1(a)(1)(i) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended to read:Section 1206.1. Out-of-State Applicants for Certification.--(a) The Department of Education shall issue a comparable Pennsylvania certificate to an out-of-State candidate who satisfies one of the following:(1) Holds a valid and current instructional certificate issued by another state and satisfies the following:(i) Completion of a college or university educator preparation program approved by the certifying state and satisfaction of testing requirements [demonstrating subject 1234567891011121314151617181920 matter competency in the applicable area of Pennsylvania certification, including passage of related content tests required by the certifying state and field experience] established by the certifying state.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2353PN3122 - 2 - 123456